Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-615
County; impound dog; cost and penalties.

A county may impound any dog deemed to be running at large. The owner of such dog shall pay the reasonable cost and penalties provided for the violation of such prohibition, including the expense of impounding and keeping the dog.

Laws 1963, c. 104, § 2, p. 429;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 14.